Connecticut, session 2026, HB05016.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701a of the general statutes be amended to increase
the amount of the personal income tax deduction for contributions to
accounts for 529 qualified state tuition programs established and
maintained by the state, from five thousand dollars for individual
taxpayers to ten thousand dollars and from ten thousand dollars for
taxpayers filing a joint return to twenty thousand dollars.